Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.010

Definitions. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1829-S.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Noncertified tribe" means a federally recognized tribe located within the borders of the state of Washington that is requesting that a tribal fugitive be surrendered to the duly authorized agent of the tribe, but has not received approval to exercise jurisdiction under the tribal law and order act of 2010, section 234, codified at 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1302, and which has agreed by treaty or practice not to shelter or conceal offenders against the laws of the state of Washington but to deliver them up to state authorities for prosecution.

(2) "Certified tribe" means a federally recognized tribe located within the borders of the state of Washington that (a) may impose a term of imprisonment of greater than one year, or a fine greater than $5,000, or both, pursuant to the tribal law and order act of 2010, section 234, codified at 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1302; and (b) has agreed not to shelter or conceal offenders against the laws of the state of Washington but to deliver them up to state authorities for prosecution.

(3) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 10.93.020(4).

(4) "Place of detention" means a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020, a correctional facility as defined in RCW 72.09.015, and any similar facility contracted by a city or county.

(5) "Tribal court judge" includes every judicial officer authorized alone or with others, to hold or preside over the criminal court of a certified tribe or noncertified tribe.

(6) "Tribal fugitive" or "fugitive" means any person who is subject to tribal court criminal jurisdiction, committed an alleged crime under the tribal code, and thereafter fled tribal jurisdiction, including by escaping or evading confinement, breaking the terms of their probation, bail, or parole, or absenting themselves from the jurisdiction of the tribal court.

(7) "Tribal police officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 10.92.010.

[ 2024 c 207 s 2.]